Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1181.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.13, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Examination subjects and locations; provisions for color blindness, disabled veterans. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the commissioner must examine each applicant for a driver's license by such agency as the commissioner directs. This examination must include: (1) a test of the applicant's eyesight, provided that this requirement is met by submission of a vision examination certificate under section 171.06, subdivision 7; (2) a test of the applicant's ability to read and understand highway signs regulating, warning, and directing traffic; (3) a test of the applicant's knowledge of (i) traffic laws; (ii) the effects of alcohol and drugs on a driver's ability to operate a motor vehicle safely and legally, and of the legal penalties and financial consequences resulting from violations of laws prohibiting the operation of a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or drugs; (iii) railroad grade crossing safety; (iv) slow-moving vehicle safety; (v) laws relating to pupil transportation safety, including the significance of school bus lights, signals, stop arm, and passing a school bus; (vi) traffic laws related to bicycles; and (vii) the circumstances and dangers of carbon monoxide poisoning; (4) an actual demonstration of ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in the operation of a motor vehicle; and (5) other physical and mental examinations as the commissioner finds necessary to determine the applicant's fitness to operate a motor vehicle safely upon the highways. (b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), the commissioner must not deny an application for a driver's license based on the exclusive grounds that the applicant's eyesight is deficient in color perception or that the applicant has been diagnosed with diabetes mellitus. War veterans operating motor vehicles especially equipped for disabled persons, if otherwise entitled to a license, must be granted such license. (c) The commissioner must ensure that an applicant may take an exam either in the county where the applicant resides or in an adjacent county at a reasonably convenient location. The schedule for each exam station must be posted on the department's website.new text begin Subject to the requirements of paragraph (d), the commissioner must make class D road skills examination appointments available six months in advance, with at least 50 percent of projected appointments available to book three months in advance, 75 percent of projected appointments available to book two months in advance, and 100 percent of projected appointments available to book one month in advance. new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner must ensure only qualifying applicants may book a class D road skills examination appointment earlier than one month in advance. For purposes of this paragraph, a qualifying applicant means: new text end new text begin (1) the applicant resides in the same city or zip code where an exam station is located; or new text end new text begin (2) the applicant resides in an adjacent city or zip code where an exam station is located. new text end deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end The commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end ensure that an applicant is able to obtain an appointment for an examination to demonstrate ability under paragraph (a), clause (4), within 14 days of the applicant's request if, under the applicable statutes and rules of the commissioner, the applicant is eligible to take the examination. deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end The commissioner must provide real-time information on the department's website about the availability and location of exam appointments. The website must show the next available exam dates and times for each exam station. The website must also provide an option for a person to enter an address to see the date and time of the next available exam at each exam station sorted by distance from the address provided. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, for examinations on or after that date. new text end